Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 7. MENTAL HEALTH AND INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

SUBTITLE A. SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS OR AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

CHAPTER 533A. POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 533A.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of aging and disability services.

(2) "Department" means the Department of Aging and Disability Services.

(3) "Department facility" means a facility listed in Section 532A.001(b).

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 533A.002. COMMISSIONER'S POWERS AND DUTIES; EFFECT OF CONFLICT WITH OTHER LAW. To the extent a power or duty given to the commissioner by this title or another law conflicts with Section 531.0055, Government Code, Section 531.0055 controls.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.57, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 533A.002. COMMISSIONER'S POWERS AND DUTIES; EFFECT OF CONFLICT WITH OTHER LAW. To the extent a power or duty given to the commissioner by this title or another law conflicts with any of the following provisions of the Government Code, the Government Code provision controls:

(1) Subchapter A, Chapter 524;

(2) Section 524.0101;

(3) Sections 524.0151(a)(2) and (b);

(4) Section 524.0202; and

(5) Section 525.0254.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.57, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 533A.003. USE OF FUNDS FOR VOLUNTEER PROGRAMS IN LOCAL AUTHORITIES AND COMMUNITY CENTERS. (a) To develop or expand a volunteer intellectual disability program in a local intellectual and developmental disability authority or a community center, the department may allocate available funds appropriated for providing volunteer intellectual disability services.

(b) The department shall develop formal policies that encourage the growth and development of volunteer intellectual disability services in local intellectual and developmental disability authorities and community centers.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.004. LIENS. (a) In this section, "department facility" includes the ICF-IID component of the Rio Grande State Center.

(a-1) The department and each community center has a lien to secure reimbursement for the cost of providing support, maintenance, and treatment to a client with an intellectual disability in an amount equal to the amount of reimbursement sought.

(b) The amount of the reimbursement sought may not exceed:

(1) the amount the department is authorized to charge under Subchapter D, Chapter 593, if the client received the services in a department facility; or

(2) the amount the community center is authorized to charge under Section 534.017 if the client received the services in a community center.

(c) The lien attaches to:

(1) all nonexempt real and personal property owned or later acquired by the client or by a person legally responsible for the client's support;

(2) a judgment of a court in this state or a decision of a public agency in a proceeding brought by or on behalf of the client to recover damages for an injury for which the client was admitted to a department facility or community center; and

(3) the proceeds of a settlement of a cause of action or a claim by the client for an injury for which the client was admitted to a department facility or community center.

(d) To secure the lien, the department or community center must file written notice of the lien with the county clerk of the county in which:

(1) the client, or the person legally responsible for the client's support, owns property; or

(2) the client received or is receiving services.

(e) The notice must contain:

(1) the name and address of the client;

(2) the name and address of the person legally responsible for the client's support, if applicable;

(3) the period during which the department facility or community center provided services or a statement that services are currently being provided; and

(4) the name and location of the department facility or community center.

(f) Not later than the 31st day before the date on which the department files the notice of the lien with the county clerk, the department shall notify by certified mail the client and the person legally responsible for the client's support. The notice must contain a copy of the charges, the statutory procedures relating to filing a lien, and the procedures to contest the charges. The executive commissioner by rule shall prescribe the procedures to contest the charges.

(g) The county clerk shall record on the written notice the name of the client, the name and address of the department facility or community center, and, if requested by the person filing the lien, the name of the person legally responsible for the client's support. The clerk shall index the notice record in the name of the client and, if requested by the person filing the lien, in the name of the person legally responsible for the client's support.

(h) The notice record must include an attachment that contains an account of the charges made by the department facility or community center and the amount due to the facility or center. The director or superintendent of the facility or center must swear to the validity of the account. The account is presumed to be correct, and in a suit to cancel the debt and discharge the lien or to foreclose on the lien, the account is sufficient evidence to authorize a court to render a judgment for the facility or center.

(i) To discharge the lien, the director or superintendent of the department facility or community center or a claims representative of the facility or center must execute and file with the county clerk of the county in which the lien notice is filed a certificate stating that the debt covered by the lien has been paid, settled, or released and authorizing the clerk to discharge the lien. The county clerk shall record a memorandum of the certificate and the date on which it is filed. The filing of the certificate and recording of the memorandum discharge the lien.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.005. EASEMENTS. The department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, may grant a temporary or permanent easement or right-of-way on land held by the department that relates to services provided under this title. The department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, must grant an easement or right-of-way on terms and conditions the executive commissioner considers to be in the state's best interest.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.006. REPORTING OF ALLEGATIONS AGAINST PHYSICIAN. (a) The executive commissioner shall submit a report to the Texas Medical Board not later than 30 days after the last day of a month during which any allegation is received by the commission that a physician employed by or under contract with the commission in relation to services provided under this title has committed an action that constitutes a ground for the denial or revocation of the physician's license under Section 164.051, Occupations Code. The report must be made in the manner provided by Section 154.051, Occupations Code.

(b) The department shall provide to the Texas Medical Board a printed and electronic copy of any report or finding relating to an investigation of an allegation reported to that board.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 573 (S.B. 241), Sec. 1.31, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 856 (S.B. 800), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 533A.007. USE OF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION. (a) Subject to any applicable requirements of Chapter 250, the department, in relation to services provided under this title, or a local intellectual and developmental disability authority or community center, may deny employment or volunteer status to an applicant if:

(1) the department, authority, or community center determines that the applicant's criminal history record information indicates that the person is not qualified or suitable; or

(2) the applicant fails to provide a complete set of fingerprints if the department establishes that method of obtaining criminal history record information.

(b) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules relating to the use of information obtained under this section, including rules that prohibit an adverse personnel action based on arrest warrant or wanted persons information received by the department.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.0075. EXCHANGE OF EMPLOYMENT RECORDS. The department, in relation to services provided under this title, or a local intellectual and developmental disability authority or community center, may exchange with one another the employment records of an employee or former employee who applies for employment at the department, authority, or community center.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.008. EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS OR AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY. (a) Each department facility and community center shall annually assess the feasibility of converting entry level support positions into employment opportunities for individuals with mental illness or an intellectual disability in the facility's or center's service area.

(b) In making the assessment, the department facility or community center shall consider the feasibility of using an array of job opportunities that may lead to competitive employment, including sheltered employment and supported employment.

(c) Each department facility and community center shall annually submit to the department a report showing that the facility or center has complied with Subsection (a).

(d) The department shall compile information from the reports and shall make the information available to each designated provider in a service area.

(e) Each department facility and community center shall ensure that designated staff are trained to:

(1) assist clients through the Social Security Administration disability determination process;

(2) provide clients and their families information related to the Social Security Administration Work Incentive Provisions; and

(3) assist clients in accessing and utilizing the Social Security Administration Work Incentive Provisions to finance training, services, and supports needed to obtain career goals.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.009. EXCHANGE OF CLIENT RECORDS. (a) Department facilities, local intellectual and developmental disability authorities, community centers, other designated providers, and subcontractors of intellectual disability services are component parts of one service delivery system within which client records may be exchanged without the client's consent.

(b) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.0095. COLLECTION AND MAINTENANCE OF INFORMATION REGARDING PERSONS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall require the department to collect information and maintain current records regarding a person found not guilty of an offense by reason of insanity under Chapter 46C, Code of Criminal Procedure, who is:

(1) committed by a court for long-term placement in a residential care facility under Chapter 593 or under Chapter 46C, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(2) ordered by a court to receive outpatient or community-based treatment and supervision.

(b) Information maintained by the department under this section must include the name and address of any facility to which the person is committed, the length of the person's commitment to the facility, and any post-release outcome.

(c) The department shall file annually with the presiding officer of each house of the legislature a written report containing the name of each person described by Subsection (a), the name and address of any facility to which the person is committed, the length of the person's commitment to the facility, and any post-release outcome.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.010. INFORMATION RELATING TO CONDITION. (a) A person, including a hospital, nursing facility, medical society, or other organization, may provide to the department or a medical organization, hospital, or hospital committee any information, including interviews, reports, statements, or memoranda relating to a person's condition and treatment for use in a study to reduce mental illness and intellectual disabilities.

(b) The department or a medical organization, hospital, or hospital committee receiving the information may use or publish the information only to advance mental health and intellectual disability research and education in order to reduce mental illness and intellectual disabilities. A summary of the study may be released for general publication.

(c) The identity of a person whose condition or treatment is studied is confidential and may not be revealed under any circumstances. Information provided under this section and any finding or conclusion resulting from the study is privileged information.

(d) A person is not liable for damages or other relief if the person:

(1) provides information under this section;

(2) releases or publishes the findings and conclusions of the person or organization to advance mental health and intellectual disability research and education; or

(3) releases or publishes generally a summary of a study.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.011. RETURN OF PERSON WITH AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY TO STATE OF RESIDENCE. (a) In this section, "department facility" includes the ICF-IID component of the Rio Grande State Center.

(a-1) The department may return a nonresident person with an intellectual disability who is committed to a department facility in this state to the proper agency of the person's state of residence.

(b) The department may permit the return of a resident of this state who is committed to a facility for persons with an intellectual disability in another state.

(c) The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with the proper agencies of other states to facilitate the return of persons committed to department facilities in this state, or facilities for persons with an intellectual disability in another state, to the state of their residence.

(d) The director of a department facility may detain for not more than 96 hours pending a court order in a commitment proceeding in this state a person with an intellectual disability returned to this state.

(e) The state returning a person with an intellectual disability to another state shall bear the expenses of returning the person.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.012. COOPERATION OF STATE AGENCIES. At the department's request and in coordination with the executive commissioner, all state departments, agencies, officers, and employees shall cooperate with the department in activities that are consistent with their functions and that relate to services provided under this title.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.015. UNANNOUNCED INSPECTIONS. The department may make any inspection of a department facility or program under the department's jurisdiction under this title without announcing the inspection.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.016. CERTAIN PROCUREMENTS OF GOODS AND SERVICES BY SERVICE PROVIDERS.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(a) This section does not apply to a "health and human services agency," as that term is defined by Section 531.001, Government Code.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(a) This section does not apply to a "health and human services agency," as that term is defined by Section 521.0001, Government Code.

(a-1) A state agency, local agency, or local intellectual and developmental disability authority that expends public money to acquire goods or services in connection with providing or coordinating the provision of intellectual disability services may satisfy the requirements of any state law requiring procurements by competitive bidding or competitive sealed proposals by procuring goods or services with the public money in accordance with Section 533A.017 or in accordance with:

(1) Section 32.043 or 32.044, Human Resources Code, if the entity is a public hospital subject to those laws; or

(2) this section, if the entity is not covered by Subdivision (1).

(b) An agency or authority under Subsection (a-1)(2) may acquire goods or services by any procurement method that provides the best value to the agency or authority. The agency or authority shall document that the agency or authority considered all relevant factors under Subsection (c) in making the acquisition.

(c) Subject to Subsection (d), the agency or authority may consider all relevant factors in determining the best value, including:

(1) any installation costs;

(2) the delivery terms;

(3) the quality and reliability of the vendor's goods or services;

(4) the extent to which the goods or services meet the agency's or authority's needs;

(5) indicators of probable vendor performance under the contract such as past vendor performance, the vendor's financial resources and ability to perform, the vendor's experience and responsibility, and the vendor's ability to provide reliable maintenance agreements;

(6) the impact on the ability of the agency or authority to comply with laws and rules relating to historically underutilized businesses or relating to the procurement of goods and services from persons with disabilities;

(7) the total long-term cost to the agency or authority of acquiring the vendor's goods or services;

(8) the cost of any employee training associated with the acquisition;

(9) the effect of an acquisition on the agency's or authority's productivity;

(10) the acquisition price; and

(11) any other factor relevant to determining the best value for the agency or authority in the context of a particular acquisition.

(d) If a state agency to which this section applies acquires goods or services with a value that exceeds $100,000, the state agency shall consult with and receive approval from the commission before considering factors other than price and meeting specifications.

(e) The state auditor or the executive commissioner may audit the agency's or authority's acquisitions of goods and services under this section to the extent state money or federal money appropriated by the state is used to make the acquisitions.

(f) The agency or authority may adopt rules and procedures for the acquisition of goods and services under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.58, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 533A.017. PARTICIPATION IN PURCHASING CONTRACTS OR GROUP PURCHASING PROGRAM.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(a) This section does not apply to a "health and human services agency," as that term is defined by Section 531.001, Government Code.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(a) This section does not apply to a "health and human services agency," as that term is defined by Section 521.0001, Government Code.

(b) The executive commissioner may allow a state agency, local agency, or local intellectual and developmental disability authority that expends public money to purchase goods or services in connection with providing or coordinating the provision of intellectual disability services to purchase goods or services with the public money by participating in:

(1) a contract the executive commissioner has made to purchase goods or services; or

(2) a group purchasing program established or designated by the executive commissioner that offers discounts to providers of intellectual disability services.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.59, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 533A.018. REVENUE FROM SPECIAL OLYMPICS TEXAS LICENSE PLATES. Annually, the department shall distribute the money deposited under Section 504.621, Transportation Code, to the credit of the account created in the trust fund created under Section 504.6012, Transportation Code, to Special Olympics Texas to be used only to pay for costs associated with training and with area and regional competitions of the Special Olympics Texas.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO PROVISION OF INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY SERVICES

Sec. 533A.031. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Elderly resident" means a person 65 years of age or older residing in a department facility.

(2) "ICF-IID and related waiver programs" includes ICF-IID Section 1915(c) waiver programs, home and community-based services, Texas home living waiver services, or another Medicaid program serving persons with an intellectual disability.

(3) "Qualified service provider" means an entity that meets requirements for service providers established by the executive commissioner.

(4) "Section 1915(c) waiver program" means a federally funded Medicaid program of the state that is authorized under Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396n(c)).

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.032. LONG-RANGE PLANNING.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(a) The department shall have a long-range plan relating to the provision of services under this title covering at least six years that includes at least the provisions required by Section 531.023, Government Code, and Chapter 2056, Government Code. The plan must cover the provision of services in and policies for state-operated institutions and ensure that the medical needs of the most medically fragile persons with an intellectual disability the department serves are met.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(a) The department shall have a long-range plan relating to the provision of services under this title covering at least six years that includes at least the provisions required by Sections 525.0154, 525.0155, and 525.0156, Government Code, and Chapter 2056, Government Code. The plan must cover the provision of services in and policies for state-operated institutions and ensure that the medical needs of the most medically fragile persons with an intellectual disability the department serves are met.

(b) In developing the plan, the department shall:

(1) solicit input from:

(A) local intellectual and developmental disability authorities;

(B) community representatives;

(C) consumers of intellectual disability services, including consumers of campus-based and community-based services, and family members of consumers of those services; and

(D) other interested persons; and

(2) consider the report developed under Subsection (c).

(c) The department shall develop a report containing information and recommendations regarding the most efficient long-term use and management of the department's campus-based facilities. The report must:

(1) project future bed requirements for state supported living centers;

(2) document the methodology used to develop the projection of future bed requirements;

(3) project maintenance costs for institutional facilities;

(4) recommend strategies to maximize the use of institutional facilities; and

(5) specify how each state supported living center will:

(A) serve and support the communities and consumers in its service area; and

(B) fulfill statewide needs for specialized services.

(d) In developing the report under Subsection (c), the department shall:

(1) conduct two public meetings, one meeting to be held at the beginning of the process and the second meeting to be held at the end of the process, to receive comments from interested parties; and

(2) consider:

(A) the medical needs of the most medically fragile of its clients with an intellectual disability;

(B) the provision of services to clients with a severe and profound intellectual disability and to persons with an intellectual disability who are medically fragile or have behavioral problems;

(C) the program and service preference information collected under Section 533A.038; and

(D) input solicited from consumers of services of state supported living centers.

(g) The department shall:

(1) attach the report required by Subsection (c) to the department's legislative appropriations request for each biennium;

(2) at the time the department presents its legislative appropriations request, present the report to the:

(A) governor;

(B) governor's budget office;

(C) lieutenant governor;

(D) speaker of the house of representatives;

(E) Legislative Budget Board; and

(F) commission; and

(3) update the department's long-range plan biennially and include the report in the plan.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.56, eff. April 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.60, eff. April 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1147 (S.B. 956), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 533A.0325. CONTINUUM OF SERVICES IN DEPARTMENT FACILITIES. The executive commissioner by rule shall establish criteria regarding the uses of department facilities as part of a full continuum of services under this title.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.0335. COMPREHENSIVE ASSESSMENT AND RESOURCE ALLOCATION PROCESS.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(a) In this section:

(1) "Advisory committee" means the Intellectual and Developmental Disability System Redesign Advisory Committee established under Section 534.053, Government Code.

(2) "Functional need," "ICF-IID program," and "Medicaid waiver program" have the meanings assigned those terms by Section 534.001, Government Code.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(a) In this section:

(1) "Advisory committee" means the Intellectual and Developmental Disability System Redesign Advisory Committee established under Section 542.0052, Government Code.

(2) "Functional need," "ICF-IID program," and "Medicaid waiver program" have the meanings assigned those terms by Section 542.0001, Government Code.

(b) Subject to the availability of federal funding, the department shall develop and implement a comprehensive assessment instrument and a resource allocation process for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities as needed to ensure that each individual with an intellectual or developmental disability receives the type, intensity, and range of services that are both appropriate and available, based on the functional needs of that individual, if the individual receives services through one of the following:

(1) a Medicaid waiver program;

(2) the ICF-IID program; or

(3) an intermediate care facility operated by the state and providing services for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(c) The department, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall establish a prior authorization process for requests for supervised living or residential support services available in the home and community-based services (HCS) Medicaid waiver program. The process must ensure that supervised living or residential support services available in the home and community-based services (HCS) Medicaid waiver program are available only to individuals for whom a more independent setting is not appropriate or available.

(d) The department shall cooperate with the advisory committee to establish the prior authorization process required by Subsection (c). This subsection expires January 1, 2024.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.61, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 533A.034. AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT FOR COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES. The department may cooperate, negotiate, and contract with local agencies, hospitals, private organizations and foundations, community centers, physicians, and other persons to plan, develop, and provide community-based intellectual disability services.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.0345. STATE AGENCY SERVICES STANDARDS. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall develop model program standards for intellectual disability services for use by each state agency that provides or pays for intellectual disability services. The department shall provide the model standards to each agency that provides intellectual disability services as identified by the commission.

(b) Model standards developed under Subsection (a) must be designed to improve the consistency of intellectual disability services provided by or through a state agency.

(c) Biennially the department shall review the model standards developed under Subsection (a) and determine whether each standard contributes effectively to the consistency of service delivery by state agencies.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.035. LOCAL INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY AUTHORITIES. (a) The executive commissioner shall designate a local intellectual and developmental disability authority in one or more local service areas. The executive commissioner may delegate to the local authority the authority and responsibility of the executive commissioner, the commission, or a department of the commission related to planning, policy development, coordination, including coordination with criminal justice entities, resource allocation, and resource development for and oversight of intellectual disability services in the most appropriate and available setting to meet individual needs in that service area. The executive commissioner may designate a single entity as both the local mental health authority under Chapter 533 and the local intellectual and developmental disability authority under this chapter for a service area.

(b) The department by contract or other method of allocation, including a case-rate or capitated arrangement, may disburse to a local intellectual and developmental disability authority department federal and department state funds to be spent in the local service area for community intellectual disability services.

(c) A local intellectual and developmental disability authority, with the approval of the department, shall use the funds received under Subsection (b) to ensure intellectual disability services are provided in the local service area. The local authority shall consider public input, ultimate cost-benefit, and client care issues to ensure consumer choice and the best use of public money in:

(1) assembling a network of service providers;

(2) making recommendations relating to the most appropriate and available treatment alternatives for individuals in need of intellectual disability services; and

(3) procuring services for a local service area, including a request for proposal or open-enrollment procurement method.

(d) A local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall demonstrate to the department that the services that the authority provides directly or through subcontractors and that involve state funds comply with relevant state standards.

(e) A local intellectual and developmental disability authority may serve as a provider of ICF-IID and related waiver programs only if:

(1) the local authority complies with the limitations prescribed by Section 533A.0355(d); or

(2) the ICF-IID and related waiver programs are necessary to ensure the availability of services and the local authority demonstrates to the commission that there is not a willing ICF-IID and related waiver program qualified service provider in the local authority's service area where the service is needed.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.0352. LOCAL AUTHORITY PLANNING FOR LOCAL SERVICE AREA. (a) Each local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall develop a local service area plan to maximize the authority's services by using the best and most cost-effective means of using federal, state, and local resources to meet the needs of the local community according to the relative priority of those needs. Each local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall undertake to maximize federal funding.

(b) A local service area plan must be consistent with the purposes, goals, and policies stated in Section 531.001 and the department's long-range plan developed under Section 533A.032.

(c) The department and a local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall use the local authority's local service plan as the basis for contracts between the department and the local authority and for establishing the local authority's responsibility for achieving outcomes related to the needs and characteristics of the authority's local service area.

(d) In developing the local service area plan, the local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall:

(1) solicit information regarding community needs from:

(A) representatives of the local community;

(B) consumers of community-based intellectual disability services and members of the families of those consumers;

(C) consumers of services of state supported living centers, members of families of those consumers, and members of state supported living center volunteer services councils, if a state supported living center is located in the local service area of the local authority; and

(D) other interested persons; and

(2) consider:

(A) criteria for assuring accountability for, cost-effectiveness of, and relative value of service delivery options;

(B) goals to ensure a client with an intellectual disability is placed in the least restrictive environment appropriate to the person's care;

(C) opportunities for innovation to ensure that the local authority is communicating to all potential and incoming consumers about the availability of services of state supported living centers for persons with an intellectual disability in the local service area of the local authority;

(D) goals to divert consumers of services from the criminal justice system; and

(E) opportunities for innovation in services and service delivery.

(e) The department and the local intellectual and developmental disability authority by contract shall enter into a performance agreement that specifies required standard outcomes for the programs administered by the local authority. Performance related to the specified outcomes must be verifiable by the department. The performance agreement must include measures related to the outputs, costs, and units of service delivered. Information regarding the outputs, costs, and units of service delivered shall be recorded in the local authority's automated data systems, and reports regarding the outputs, costs, and units of service delivered shall be submitted to the department at least annually as provided by department rule.

(f) The department and the local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall provide an opportunity for community centers and advocacy groups to provide information or assistance in developing the specified performance outcomes under Subsection (e).

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.0355. LOCAL INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY AUTHORITY RESPONSIBILITIES. (a) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules establishing the roles and responsibilities of local intellectual and developmental disability authorities.

(b) In adopting rules under this section, the executive commissioner must include rules regarding the following local intellectual and developmental disability authority responsibilities:

(1) access;

(2) intake;

(3) eligibility functions;

(4) enrollment, initial person-centered assessment, and service authorization;

(5) utilization management;

(6) safety net functions, including crisis management services and assistance in accessing facility-based care;

(7) service coordination functions;

(8) provision and oversight of state general revenue services;

(9) local planning functions, including stakeholder involvement, technical assistance and training, and provider complaint and resolution processes; and

(10) processes to assure accountability in performance, compliance, and monitoring.

(c) In determining eligibility under Subsection (b)(3), a local intellectual and developmental disability authority must offer a state supported living center as an option among the residential services and other community living options available to an individual who is eligible for those services and who meets the department's criteria for state supported living center admission, regardless of whether other residential services are available to the individual.

(d) In establishing a local intellectual and developmental disability authority's role as a qualified service provider of ICF-IID and related waiver programs under Section 533A.035(e), the executive commissioner shall require the local intellectual and developmental disability authority to:

(1) base the local authority's provider capacity on the local authority's August 2004 enrollment levels for the waiver programs the local authority operates and, if the local authority's enrollment levels exceed those levels, to reduce the levels by attrition; and

(2) base any increase in the local authority's provider capacity on:

(A) the local authority's state-mandated conversion from an ICF-IID program to a Section 1915(c) waiver program allowing for a permanent increase in the local authority's provider capacity in accordance with the number of persons who choose the local authority as their provider;

(B) the local authority's voluntary conversion from an ICF-IID program to a Section 1915(c) waiver program allowing for a temporary increase in the local authority's provider capacity, to be reduced by attrition, in accordance with the number of persons who choose the local authority as their provider;

(C) the local authority's refinancing from services funded solely by state general revenue to a Medicaid program allowing for a temporary increase in the local authority's provider capacity, to be reduced by attrition, in accordance with the number of persons who choose the local authority as their provider; or

(D) other extenuating circumstances that:

(i) are monitored and approved by the department;

(ii) do not include increases that unnecessarily promote the local authority's provider role over its role as a local intellectual and developmental disability authority; and

(iii) may include increases necessary to accommodate a family-specific or consumer-specific circumstance and choice.

(e) Any increase based on extenuating circumstances under Subsection (d)(2)(D) is considered a temporary increase in the local intellectual and developmental disability authority's provider capacity, to be reduced by attrition.

(f) At least biennially, the department shall review and determine the local intellectual and developmental disability authority's status as a qualified service provider in accordance with criteria that includes the consideration of the local authority's ability to assure the availability of services in its area, including:

(1) program stability and viability;

(2) the number of other qualified service providers in the area; and

(3) the geographical area in which the local authority is located.

(g) The department shall ensure that local services delivered further the following goals:

(1) to provide individuals with the information, opportunities, and support to make informed decisions regarding the services for which the individual is eligible;

(2) to respect the rights, needs, and preferences of an individual receiving services; and

(3) to integrate individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities into the community in accordance with relevant independence initiatives and permanency planning laws.

(h) The department shall ensure that local intellectual and developmental disability authorities are informing and counseling individuals and their legally authorized representatives, if applicable, about all program and service options for which the individuals are eligible in accordance with Section 533A.038(d), including options such as the availability and types of ICF-IID placements for which an individual may be eligible while the individual is on a department interest list or other waiting list for other services.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.03551. FLEXIBLE, LOW-COST HOUSING OPTIONS. (a) To the extent permitted under federal law and regulations, the executive commissioner shall adopt or amend rules as necessary to allow for the development of additional housing supports for individuals with disabilities, including individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, in urban and rural areas, including:

(1) a selection of community-based housing options that comprise a continuum of integration, varying from most to least restrictive, that permits individuals to select the most integrated and least restrictive setting appropriate to the individual's needs and preferences;

(2) provider-owned and non-provider-owned residential settings;

(3) assistance with living more independently; and

(4) rental properties with on-site supports.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(b) The department, in cooperation with the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs, the Department of Agriculture, the Texas State Affordable Housing Corporation, and the Intellectual and Developmental Disability System Redesign Advisory Committee established under Section 534.053, Government Code, shall coordinate with federal, state, and local public housing entities as necessary to expand opportunities for accessible, affordable, and integrated housing to meet the complex needs of individuals with disabilities, including individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(b) The department, in cooperation with the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs, the Department of Agriculture, the Texas State Affordable Housing Corporation, and the Intellectual and Developmental Disability System Redesign Advisory Committee established under Section 542.0052, Government Code, shall coordinate with federal, state, and local public housing entities as necessary to expand opportunities for accessible, affordable, and integrated housing to meet the complex needs of individuals with disabilities, including individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(c) The department shall develop a process to receive input from statewide stakeholders to ensure the most comprehensive review of opportunities and options for housing services described by this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.62, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 533A.03552. BEHAVIORAL SUPPORTS FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES AT RISK OF INSTITUTIONALIZATION; INTERVENTION TEAMS. (a) Subject to the availability of federal funding, the department shall develop and implement specialized training for providers, family members, caregivers, and first responders providing direct services and supports to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and behavioral health needs who are at risk of institutionalization.

(b) Subject to the availability of federal funding, the department shall establish one or more behavioral health intervention teams to provide services and supports to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and behavioral health needs who are at risk of institutionalization. An intervention team may include a:

(1) psychiatrist or psychologist;

(2) physician;

(3) registered nurse;

(4) pharmacist or representative of a pharmacy;

(5) behavior analyst;

(6) social worker;

(7) crisis coordinator;

(8) peer specialist; and

(9) family partner.

(c) In providing services and supports, a behavioral health intervention team established by the department shall:

(1) use the team's best efforts to ensure that an individual remains in the community and avoids institutionalization;

(2) focus on stabilizing the individual and assessing the individual for intellectual, medical, psychiatric, psychological, and other needs;

(3) provide support to the individual's family members and other caregivers;

(4) provide intensive behavioral assessment and training to assist the individual in establishing positive behaviors and continuing to live in the community; and

(5) provide clinical and other referrals.

(d) The department shall ensure that members of a behavioral health intervention team established under this section receive training on trauma-informed care, which is an approach to providing care to individuals with behavioral health needs based on awareness that a history of trauma or the presence of trauma symptoms may create the behavioral health needs of the individual.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.037. SERVICE PROGRAMS AND SHELTERED WORKSHOPS. (a) The department may provide intellectual disability services through halfway houses, sheltered workshops, community centers, and other intellectual disability services programs.

(b) The department may operate or contract for the provision of part or all of the sheltered workshop services and may contract for the sale of goods produced and services provided by a sheltered workshop program. The goods and services may be sold for cash or on credit.

(c) An operating fund may be established for each sheltered workshop the department operates. Each operating fund must be in a national or state bank that is a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(d) Money derived from gifts or grants received for sheltered workshop purposes and the proceeds from the sale of sheltered workshop goods and services shall be deposited to the credit of the operating fund. The money in the fund may be spent only in the operation of the sheltered workshop to:

(1) purchase supplies, materials, services, and equipment;

(2) pay salaries of and wages to participants and employees;

(3) construct, maintain, repair, and renovate facilities and equipment; and

(4) establish and maintain a petty cash fund of not more than $100.

(e) Money in an operating fund that is used to pay salaries of and wages to participants in the sheltered workshop program is money the department holds in trust for the participants' benefit.

(f) This section does not affect the authority or jurisdiction of a community center as prescribed by Chapter 534.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.038. FACILITIES AND SERVICES FOR CLIENTS WITH AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY. (a) In this section, "department facility" includes the ICF-IID component of the Rio Grande State Center.

(a-1) The department may designate all or any part of a department facility as a special facility for the diagnosis, special training, education, supervision, treatment, or care of clients with an intellectual disability.

(b) The department may specify the facility in which a client with an intellectual disability under the department's jurisdiction is placed.

(c) The department may maintain day classes at a department facility for the convenience and benefit of clients with an intellectual disability of the community in which the facility is located and who are not capable of enrollment in a public school system's regular or special classes.

(d) A person with an intellectual disability, or a person's legally authorized representative, seeking residential services shall receive a clear explanation of programs and services for which the person is determined to be eligible, including state supported living centers, community ICF-IID programs, waiver services under Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396n(c)), or other services. The preferred programs and services chosen by the person or the person's legally authorized representative shall be documented in the person's record. If the preferred programs or services are not available, the person or the person's legally authorized representative shall be given assistance in gaining access to alternative services and the selected waiting list.

(e) The department shall ensure that the information regarding program and service preferences collected under Subsection (d) is documented and maintained in a manner that permits the department to access and use the information for planning activities conducted under Section 533A.032.

(f) The department may spend money appropriated for the state supported living center system only in accordance with limitations imposed by the General Appropriations Act.

(g) In addition to the explanation required under Subsection (d), the department shall ensure that each person inquiring about residential services receives:

(1) a pamphlet or similar informational material explaining that any programs and services for which the person is determined to be eligible, including state supported living centers, community ICF-IID programs, waiver services under Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396n(c)), or other services, may be an option available to an individual who is eligible for those services; and

(2) information relating to whether appropriate residential services are available in each program and service for which the person is determined to be eligible, including state supported living centers, community ICF-IID programs, waiver services under Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396n(c)), or other services located nearest to the residence of the proposed resident.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.040. SERVICES FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH. The department shall ensure the development of programs and the expansion of services at the community level for children with an intellectual disability, or with a dual diagnosis of an intellectual disability and mental illness, and for their families. The department shall:

(1) prepare and review budgets for services for children;

(2) develop departmental policies relating to children's programs and service delivery; and

(3) increase interagency coordination activities to enhance the provision of services for children.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.0415. MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING ON INTERAGENCY TRAINING. (a) The executive commissioner, the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, and the Texas Education Agency by rule shall adopt a joint memorandum of understanding to develop interagency training for the staffs of the department, the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, and the Texas Education Agency who are involved in the functions of assessment, case planning, case management, and in-home or direct delivery of services to children, youth, and their families under this title. The memorandum must:

(1) outline the responsibility of each agency in coordinating and developing a plan for interagency training on individualized assessment and effective intervention and treatment services for children and dysfunctional families; and

(2) provide for the establishment of an interagency task force to:

(A) develop a training program to include identified competencies, content, and hours for completion of the training with at least 20 hours of training required each year until the program is completed;

(B) design a plan for implementing the program, including regional site selection, frequency of training, and selection of experienced clinical public and private professionals or consultants to lead the training; and

(C) monitor, evaluate, and revise the training program, including the development of additional curricula based on future training needs identified by staff and professionals.

(b) The task force consists of:

(1) one clinical professional and one training staff member from each agency, appointed by that agency; and

(2) 10 private sector clinical professionals with expertise in dealing with troubled children, youth, and dysfunctional families, two of whom are appointed by each agency.

(c) The task force shall meet at the call of the department.

(d) The commission shall act as the lead agency in coordinating the development and implementation of the memorandum.

(e) The executive commissioner and the agencies shall review and by rule revise the memorandum not later than August each year.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.042. EVALUATION OF ELDERLY RESIDENTS. (a) The department shall evaluate each elderly resident at least annually to determine if the resident can be appropriately served in a less restrictive setting.

(b) The department shall consider the proximity to the resident of family, friends, and advocates concerned with the resident's well-being in determining whether the resident should be moved from a department facility or to a different department facility. The department shall recognize that a nursing facility may not be able to meet the special needs of an elderly resident.

(c) In evaluating an elderly resident under this section and to ensure appropriate placement, the department shall identify the special needs of the resident, the types of services that will best meet those needs, and the type of facility that will best provide those services.

(d) The appropriate interdisciplinary team shall conduct the evaluation of an elderly resident of a department facility.

(e) The department shall attempt to place an elderly resident in a less restrictive setting if the department determines that the resident can be appropriately served in that setting. The department shall coordinate the attempt with the local intellectual and developmental disability authority.

(f) A local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall provide continuing care for an elderly resident placed in the authority's service area under this section.

(g) The local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall have the right of access to all residents and records of residents who request continuing care services.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.043. PROPOSALS FOR GERIATRIC CARE. (a) The department shall solicit proposals from community providers to operate community residential programs for elderly residents at least every two years.

(b) The department shall require each provider to:

(1) offer adequate assurances of ability to:

(A) provide the required services;

(B) meet department standards; and

(C) safeguard the safety and well-being of each resident; and

(2) sign a memorandum of agreement with the local intellectual and developmental disability authority outlining the responsibilities for continuity of care and monitoring, if the provider is not the local authority.

(c) The department may fund a proposal through a contract if the provider agrees to meet the requirements prescribed by Subsection (b) and agrees to provide the services at a cost that is equal to or less than the cost to the department to provide the services.

(d) The appropriate local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall monitor the services provided to a resident placed in a program funded under this section. The department may monitor any service for which it contracts.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO ICF-IID PROGRAM

Sec. 533A.062. PLAN ON LONG-TERM CARE FOR PERSONS WITH AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY. (a) The department shall biennially develop a proposed plan on long-term care for persons with an intellectual disability.

(b) The proposed plan must specify the capacity of the HCS waiver program for persons with an intellectual disability and the number and levels of new ICF-IID beds to be authorized in each region. In developing the proposed plan, the department shall consider:

(1) the needs of the population to be served;

(2) projected appropriation amounts for the biennium; and

(3) the requirements of applicable federal law.

(b-1) As part of the proposed plan, the commission shall review the statewide bed capacity of community ICF-IID facilities for individuals with an intellectual disability or a related condition and, based on the review, develop a process to reallocate beds held in suspension by the commission. The process may include:

(1) criteria by which ICF-IID program providers may apply to the commission to receive reallocated beds; and

(2) a means to reallocate the beds among health services regions.

(c) Each proposed plan shall cover the subsequent fiscal biennium. The department shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed plan. Not later than July 1 of each even-numbered year, the department shall submit the plan to the commission for approval.

(d) The commission may modify the proposed plan as necessary before its final approval.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 856 (S.B. 800), Sec. 25(8), eff. September 1, 2021.

(f) After legislative action on the appropriation for long-term care services for persons with an intellectual disability, the commission shall adjust the plan to ensure that the number of ICF-IID beds licensed or approved as meeting license requirements and the capacity of the HCS waiver program are within appropriated funding amounts.

(g) After any necessary adjustments, the commission shall approve the final biennial plan and publish the plan in the Texas Register.

(h) The department may submit proposed amendments to the plan to the commission.

(i) In this section, "HCS waiver program" means services under the state Medicaid home and community-based services waiver program for persons with an intellectual disability adopted in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Section 1396n(c).

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 573 (S.B. 241), Sec. 1.32, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1153 (H.B. 3117), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 856 (S.B. 800), Sec. 25(8), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 533A.066. INFORMATION RELATING TO ICF-IID PROGRAM. (a) At least annually, the department shall sponsor a conference on the ICF-IID program to:

(1) assist providers in understanding survey rules;

(2) review deficiencies commonly found in ICF-IID facilities; and

(3) inform providers of any recent changes in the rules or in the interpretation of the rules relating to the ICF-IID program.

(b) The department also may use any other method to provide necessary information to providers, including publications.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. POWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO DEPARTMENT FACILITIES

Sec. 533A.081. DEVELOPMENT OF FACILITY BUDGETS. The department, in budgeting for a facility, shall use uniform costs for specific types of services a facility provides unless a legitimate reason exists and is documented for the use of other costs.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.082. DETERMINATION OF SAVINGS IN FACILITIES. (a) The department shall determine the degree to which the costs of operating department facilities for persons with an intellectual disability in compliance with applicable standards are affected as populations in the facilities fluctuate.

(b) In making the determination, the department shall:

(1) assume that the current level of services and necessary state of repair of the facilities will be maintained; and

(2) include sufficient funds to allow the department to comply with the requirements of litigation and applicable standards.

(c) The department shall allocate to community-based intellectual disability programs any savings realized in operating department facilities for persons with an intellectual disability.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.083. CRITERIA FOR EXPANSION, CLOSURE, OR CONSOLIDATION OF FACILITY. The department shall establish objective criteria for determining when a new facility may be needed and when a state supported living center may be expanded, closed, or consolidated.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.084. MANAGEMENT OF SURPLUS REAL PROPERTY. (a) To the extent provided by this subtitle, the department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, may lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of any surplus real property related to the provision of services under this title, including any improvements under its management and control, or authorize the lease, transfer, or disposal of the property. Surplus property is property the executive commissioner designates as having minimal value to the present service delivery system and projects to have minimal value to the service delivery system as described in the department's long-range plan.

(b) The proceeds from the lease, transfer, or disposal of surplus real property, including any improvements, shall be deposited to the credit of the department in the Texas capital trust fund established under Chapter 2201, Government Code. The proceeds may be appropriated only for improvements to the department's system of intellectual disability facilities.

(c) A lease proposal shall be advertised at least once a week for four consecutive weeks in at least two newspapers. One newspaper must be a newspaper published in the municipality in which the property is located or the daily newspaper published nearest to the property's location. The other newspaper must have statewide circulation. Each lease is subject to the attorney general's approval as to substance and form. The executive commissioner shall adopt forms, rules, and contracts that, in the executive commissioner's best judgment, will protect the state's interests. The executive commissioner may reject any or all bids.

(d) This section does not authorize the executive commissioner or department to close or consolidate a state supported living center without first obtaining legislative approval.

(e) Notwithstanding Subsection (c), the executive commissioner, in coordination with the department, may enter into a written agreement with the General Land Office to administer lease proposals. If the General Land Office administers a lease proposal under the agreement, notice that the property is offered for lease must be published in accordance with Section 32.107, Natural Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.0846. INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY COMMUNITY SERVICES ACCOUNT. (a) The intellectual disability community services account is an account in the general revenue fund that may be appropriated only for the provision of intellectual disability services by or under contract with the department.

(b) The department shall deposit to the credit of the intellectual disability community services account any money donated to the state for inclusion in the account, including life insurance proceeds designated for deposit to the account.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.085. FACILITIES FOR INMATE AND PAROLEE CARE. (a) With the written approval of the governor, the department may contract with the Texas Department of Criminal Justice to transfer facilities to the Texas Department of Criminal Justice or otherwise provide facilities for:

(1) inmates with an intellectual disability in the custody of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice; or

(2) persons with an intellectual disability paroled or released under the supervision of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

(b) An agency must report to the governor the agency's reasons for proposing to enter into a contract under this section and request the governor's approval.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 533A.087. LEASE OF REAL PROPERTY. (a) The department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, may lease real property related to the provision of services under this title, including any improvements under the department's management and control, regardless of whether the property is surplus property. Except as provided by Subsection (c), the department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, may award a lease of real property only:

(1) at the prevailing market rate; and

(2) by competitive bid.

(b) The commission shall advertise a proposal for lease at least once a week for four consecutive weeks in:

(1) a newspaper published in the municipality in which the property is located or the daily newspaper published nearest to the property's location; and

(2) a newspaper of statewide circulation.

(c) The department, in coordination with the executive commissioner, may lease real property related to the provision of services under this title or an improvement for less than the prevailing market rate, without advertisement or without competitive bidding, if:

(1) the executive commissioner determines that sufficient public benefit will be derived from the lease; and

(2) the property is leased to:

(A) a federal or state agency;

(B) a unit of local government;

(C) a not-for-profit organization; or

(D) an entity related to the department by a service contract.

(d) The executive commissioner shall adopt leasing rules, forms, and contracts that will protect the state's interests.

(e) The executive commissioner may reject any bid.

(f) This section does not authorize the executive commissioner or department to close or consolidate a facility used to provide intellectual disability services without legislative approval.

(g) Notwithstanding Subsections (a) and (b), the executive commissioner, in coordination with the department, may enter into a written agreement with the General Land Office to administer lease proposals. If the General Land Office administers a lease proposal under the agreement, notice that the property is offered for lease must be published in accordance with Section 32.107, Natural Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. JAIL DIVERSION PROGRAM

Sec. 533A.108. PRIORITIZATION OF FUNDING FOR DIVERSION OF PERSONS FROM INCARCERATION IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) A local intellectual and developmental disability authority may develop and may prioritize its available funding for:

(1) a system to divert members of the priority population, including those members with co-occurring substance abuse disorders, before their incarceration or other contact with the criminal justice system, to services appropriate to their needs, including:

(A) screening and assessment services; and

(B) treatment services, including:

(i) short-term residential services;

(ii) crisis respite residential services; and

(iii) continuity of care services;

(2) specialized training of local law enforcement and court personnel to identify and manage offenders or suspects who may be members of the priority population; and

(3) other model programs for offenders and suspects who may be members of the priority population, including crisis intervention training for law enforcement personnel.

(b) A local intellectual and developmental disability authority developing a system, training, or a model program under Subsection (a) shall collaborate with other local resources, including local law enforcement and judicial systems and local personnel.

(c) A local intellectual and developmental disability authority may not implement a system, training, or a model program developed under this section until the system, training, or program is approved by the department.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1335, eff. April 2, 2015.